sv: Delar som ingår i leksaksset: Djur; Byggnader/strukturer; Dockhustillbehör; Figurer; Möbler; Interaktiv elektronik (ljus/ljud); Leksaksmat; Klistermärken/dekaler; Förvaringsväska; Verktyg/medicinska instrument; Fordon; Övrigt
lt-LT: Pridedami žaislų rinkinio daiktai: Gyvūnai; Pastatai / statiniai; Lėlių namelio priedai; Figūrėlės; Baldai; Interaktyvi elektronika (šviesos / garsai); Žaislinis maistas; Lipdukai; Laikymo dėklas; Įrankiai / medicininiai instrumentai; Transporto priemonės; Kita
ko: 장난감 플레이세트 품목 포함: 동물; 건물/구조물; 인형의 집 액세서리; 피규어; 가구; 인터랙티브 전자 장치(조명/사운드); 음식 장난감; 스티커/데칼; 보관 케이스; 도구/의료 기구; 차량; 기타
en: Toy playset items included: Animals; Buildings/structures; Dollhouse accessories; Figures; Furniture; Interactive electronics (lights/sound); Play food; Stickers/decals; Storage case; Tools/medical instruments; Vehicles; Other
es: Artículos incluidos en el set de juguetes: Animales; Edificios/estructuras; Accesorios de casa de muñecas; Figuras; Muebles; Electrónica interactiva (luces/sonido); Comida de juguete; Pegatinas/calcomanías; Estuche de almacenamiento; Herramientas/instrumentos médicos; Vehículos; Otro
da: Medfølgende dele i legesæt: Dyr; Bygninger/strukturer; Dukkehustilbehør; Figurer; Møbler; Interaktiv elektronik (lys/lyd); Legemad; Klistermærker/mærkater; Opbevaringskasse; Værktøj/medicinske instrumenter; Køretøjer; Andet
ru: Состав игрового набора: Животные; Здания/сооружения; Аксессуары для кукольного домика; Фигурки; Мебель; Интерактивная электроника (свет/звук); Игрушечная еда; Наклейки/декали; Футляр для хранения; Инструменты/медицинские приборы; Транспортные средства; Другое
nl: Inbegrepen speelgoedonderdelen: Dieren; Gebouwen/structuren; Poppenhuisaccessoires; Figuren; Meubels; Interactieve elektronica (verlichting/geluid); Speelgoedvoedsel; Stickers/decals; Opbergkoffer; Gereedschap/medische instrumenten; Voertuigen; Overig
fi: Lelusetin mukana tulevat osat: Eläimet; Rakennukset/rakennelmat; Nukkekodin tarvikkeet; Hahmot; Huonekalut; Interaktiivinen elektroniikka (valot/ääni); Leikkiruoka; Tarrat/siirtokuvat; Säilytyskotelo; Työkalut / lääketieteelliset instrumentit; Ajoneuvot; Muu
de: Im Spielset enthaltene Artikel: Tiere; Gebäude/Strukturen; Puppenhauszubehör; Figuren; Möbel; Interaktive Elektronik (Licht/Sound); Spiel-Lebensmittel; Aufkleber/Decals; Aufbewahrungsbox; Werkzeuge/medizinische Instrumente; Fahrzeuge; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Itens do conjunto de brinquedos incluídos: Animais; Prédios/estruturas; Acessórios de casa de bonecas; Figuras; Móveis; Eletrônicos interativos (luzes/som); Comidinhas de brinquedo; Adesivos/decalques; Estojo de armazenamento; Ferramentas/instrumentos médicos; Veículos; Outros
sl-SI: Vključeni predmeti v otroškem igralnem kompletu: Živali; Zgradbe/strukture; Dodatki za hišico za lutke; Figurice; Pohištvo; Interaktivna elektronika (luči/zvok); Igralna hrana; Nalepke; Kovček za shranjevanje; Orodja/medicinski instrumenti; Vozila; Drugo
tr: Dahil olan oyuncak oyun seti parçaları: Hayvanlar; Binalar/yapılar; Oyuncak bebek evi aksesuarları; Figürler; Mobilya; Etkileşimli elektronikler (ışık/ses); Oyuncak yiyecekler; Çıkartmalar; Saklama kutusu; Araçlar/tıbbi aletler; Araçlar; Diğer
sk-SK: Komponenty hernej zostavy v cene: Zvieratá; Budovy/štruktúry; Doplnky do domčeka pre bábiky; Figúrky; Nábytok; Interaktívna elektronika (svetlá/zvuk); Jedlo na hranie; Nálepky/obtisky; Úložné puzdro; Nástroje/lekárske nástroje; Vozidlá; Iné
th: รายการชุดของเล่นรวมอยู่ด้วย: สัตว์; อาคาร/สิ่งก่อสร้าง; อุปกรณ์เสริมสำหรับบ้านตุ๊กตา; ฟิกเกอร์; เฟอร์นิเจอร์; อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์แบบโต้ตอบ (ไฟ/เสียง); อาหารจำลอง; สติกเกอร์/รูปลอก; กล่องเก็บ; เครื่องมือ/อุปกรณ์ทางการแพทย์; ยานพาหนะ; อื่นๆ
vi: Các món đồ đi kèm trong bộ mô hình đồ chơi: Động vật; Tòa nhà/cấu trúc; Phụ kiện nhà búp bê; Nhân vật; Đồ nội thất; Thiết bị điện tử tương tác (đèn/âm thanh); Thức ăn đồ chơi; Nhãn dán/đề can; Hộp đựng; Công cụ/dụng cụ y tế; Phương tiện; Khác
nb: Inkluderte deler i lekesett: Dyr; Bygninger/strukturer; Dukkehustilbehør; Figurer; Møbler; Interaktiv elektronikk (lys/lyd); Lekemat; Klistremerker/dekaler; Oppbevaringseske; Verktøy / medisinske instrumenter; Kjøretøy; Annet
ja: トイプレイセットアイテム付き: 動物; 建物 / 構造物; ドールハウスアクセサリー; フィギュア; 家具; インタラクティブ電子機器 (ライト / 音); おままごと用食べ物; ステッカー / デカール; 収納ケース; ツール / 医療器具; 乗り物; その他
hr-HR: Uključeni elementi seta za igru: Životinje; Zgrade/strukture; Dodaci za kućicu za lutke; Figure; Namještaj; Interaktivna elektronika (svjetla/zvuk); Hrana za igru; Naljepnice/preslikači; Kutija za pohranu; Alati / medicinski instrumenti; Vozila; Ostalo
zh-CN: 包括场景玩具套装物品: 动物; 建筑/结构; 玩具屋配件; 随附人偶; 家具; 互动电子元件（灯光/声音）; 玩具食物; 贴纸/贴花; 收纳盒; 工具/医疗器械; 车辆; 其他
el: Περιλαμβάνονται είδη σετ παιχνιδιού: Ζώα; Κτίρια/δομές; Αξεσουάρ κουκλόσπιτου; Φιγούρες; Έπιπλα; Διαδραστικά ηλεκτρονικά (φώτα/ήχος); Φαγητά-παιχνίδια; Αυτοκόλλητα/χαλκομανίες; Θήκη αποθήκευσης; Εργαλεία/Ιατρικά όργανα; Οχήματα; Άλλο
bg-BG: Включени елементи в комплект за игра: Животни; Сгради/структури; Аксесоари за къща за кукли; Фигурки; Мебели; Интерактивна електроника (светлини/звук); Храна за игра; Стикери/ваденки; Калъф за съхранение; Инструменти / медицински уреди; Превозни средства; Друго
hu: Játékszett tartalma: Állatok; Épületek/szerkezetek; Babaház-kiegészítők; Figurák; Bútorok; Interaktív elektronika (fények/hang); Játék étel; Matricák/levonók; Tárolótáska; Szerszámok/orvosi műszerek; Járművek; Egyéb
cs: Položky v hrací sadě: Zvířátka; Budovy/stavby; Doplňky do domečku pro panenky; Figurky; Nábytek; Interaktivní elektronika (světla/zvuky); Potraviny na hraní; Samolepky/obtisky; Úložný kufřík; Nářadí / lékařské nástroje; Vozidla; Jiné
zh-TW: 包含玩具遊戲組品項: 動物; 建築物/結構; 娃娃屋配件; 人偶; 家具; 互動式電子設備 (燈光/音效); 玩具食物; 貼紙/轉印貼紙; 收納盒; 工具/醫療器具; 交通工具; 其他
pl: Elementy dołączone do zestawu do zabawy: Zwierzęta; Budynki/konstrukcje; Akcesoria do domku dla lalek; Figurki; Meble; Interaktywna elektronika (światło/dźwięk); Zabawkowe jedzenie; Naklejki/kalkomanie; Pojemnik; Narzędzia/instrumenty medyczne; Pojazdy; Inne
ro-RO: Articole incluse în setul de joacă: Animale; Clădiri/structuri; Accesorii pentru casă de păpuși; Figurine; Mobilier; Componente electronice interactive (lumini/sunet); Mâncare de jucărie; Autocolante/abțibilduri; Cutie de depozitare; Instrumente/aparate medicale; Vehicule; Altele
it: Articoli del playset inclusi: Animali; Edifici/strutture; Accessori per casa delle bambole; Personaggi; Mobili; Elettronica interattiva (luci/suoni); Cibo giocattolo; Adesivi/decalcomanie; Custodia; Strumenti di lavoro/medici; Veicoli; Altro
fr: Éléments du coffret de jeu inclus: Animaux; Bâtiments/structures; Accessoires de maison de poupée; Figurines; Meubles; Électronique interactive (lumières/son); Faux aliments; Autocollants/décalcomanies; Boîte de rangement; Outils/instruments médicaux; Véhicules; Autre
pt-PT: Itens incluídos no conjunto de : Animais; Edifícios/estruturas; Acessórios para casa de bonecas; Figuras; Móveis; Componentes eletrónicos interativos (luzes/som); Comida de brincar; Autocolantes/decalques; Caixa de arrumação; Ferramentas/instrumentos médicos; Veículos; Outro